Virginia statutes. Title 51.5. Persons With Disabilities.
Chapter 11. Assistive Technology Loan Fund Authority.

§ 51.5-53.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Assistive technology”
means any item, piece of equipment or device that enables an individual with a disability to improve his or her independence and quality of life.

“Authority”
means the Assistive Technology Loan Fund Authority established pursuant to this chapter.

“Board”
means the Board of Directors of the Assistive Technology Loan Fund Authority.

“Bonds”
means notes, bonds, certificates, and other evidence of indebtedness or obligation of the Authority.

“Fund”
means the Assistive Technology Loan Fund established pursuant to this chapter.

“Qualifying borrower”
means any person who demonstrates that a loan made pursuant to this chapter will assist one or more persons with disabilities to improve their independence or become more productive members of the community. The person must demonstrate creditworthiness and repayment abilities to the satisfaction of the Board.

History.

1995, c. 812; 2004, c. 728.

Cross references.

As to records which are excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.7

.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 728 added the definition of “Bonds.”

§ 51.5-54.
Declaration of purpose; Assistive Technology Loan Fund Authority established.

It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there exists in the Commonwealth a need to provide assistance with loans and in the purchase of assistive technology equipment, or other equipment, which is designed to enable persons with disabilities to become more independent or more productive members of the community with an improved quality of life.

To achieve the objectives of subsection A, the Assistive Technology Loan Fund Authority is hereby created, with such powers and duties as are set forth in this chapter, as a public body corporate and as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth.

History.

1995, c. 812; 2002, c. 19.

Cross references.

As to addressing transportation needs of populations with limited mobility in the Statewide Transportation Plan, see §

33.2-355

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 19 inserted “with loans and” and “or other equipment” in subsection A.

§ 51.5-55.
Membership of Board; terms, compensation, and expenses.

All powers, rights and duties conferred by this chapter or other provisions of law upon the Authority shall be exercised by the Board of Directors of the Authority. The Board shall consist of 12 members as follows: the Secretary of Health and Human Resources or his designee; an employee of the Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation Center; an experienced consumer lender; a certified public accountant; two persons with investment finance experience; and six persons with a range of disabilities. The citizen members shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the General Assembly. The Board shall annually elect a chairman from among its members. Board members shall receive no salaries but shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties on behalf of the Authority.

The 10 citizen members of the Board shall be appointed for four-year terms, except that appointments to fill vacancies shall be made for the unexpired terms. Representatives of state agencies shall serve coincident with the term of the Governor. No member appointed by the Governor shall be eligible to serve more than two complete terms in succession.

Meetings of the members of the Board shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever six members so request. The Board may delegate to a loan committee of at least six members the authority to review and approve or deny loan applications based upon information provided to or obtained by the Board, in accordance with criteria established by the Board. In any event, the Board shall meet as necessary to attend to the business of the Authority.

History.

1995, c. 812; 1996, c. 930; 2000, cc. 21, 294; 2002, c. 19; 2012, c. 483; 2015, c. 542.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 21 and 294 are identical, and in the second sentence of subsection A, deleted “the Treasurer of the Commonwealth, or his designee” from the list of members, and substituted “six” for “five” preceding “persons with a range of disabilities”; and in the first sentence of subsection B, increased the total number of citizen members of the Board from nine to ten.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 19 rewrote the second sentence in subsection C, which formerly read: “The Board shall meet regularly to review individual loan applications and approve or deny such applications based upon information provided to or obtained by the Board.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 483, in subsection C, in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “of at least six members” and deleted “and subject to the Board’s ratification at its next regular meeting” from the end; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 542 substituted “Wilson Workforce and Rehabilitation” for “Woodrow Wilson Rehabilitation” in subsection A.

§ 51.5-56.
Powers of the Authority.

The Authority is hereby granted all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate its purposes including, but not limited to, the following powers to:

Have perpetual existence as a public body corporate and as a political subdivision of the Commonwealth;

Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter, to regulate its affairs and to carry into effect the powers and the purposes of the Authority and for the conduct of its business. All regulations of the Authority shall be promulgated in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.);

Sue and be sued in its name;

Have an official seal and alter it at will;

Establish, administer, manage, including the creation of reserves, and make expenditures from the Fund for the sole purpose of providing loans to individuals with disabilities for the acquisition of assistive technology, other equipment, or other authorized purposes;

Administer the Fund established by this chapter and contract with the State Treasurer and other state or community-based entities or groups working with persons with disabilities for such assistance in administering the loan program as the Board may require;

Maintain an office at such place or places within the Commonwealth as it may designate;

Make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary and convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers under this chapter upon such terms and conditions as it deems appropriate, including contracts with appropriate state or community-based entities or groups dealing with disabled persons;

Employ office personnel, advisers, consultants, professionals and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and to fix their compensation. The Board shall appoint an executive director who is subordinate to the Board, and the Board shall ensure that the executive director complies with all Board, regulatory, and statutory directives. Legal services in civil matters shall be rendered and performed by the Attorney General in accordance with Chapter 5 (§

2.2-500

et seq.) of Title 2.2, and special counsel may only be employed with approval and appointment by the Attorney General or as may otherwise be authorized by §

2.2-510

;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets, including, but not limited to, loans in such amounts and from such insurers as it may deem advisable;

Receive, hold, accept, and administer from any source gifts, grants, aid or contributions of money, property, labor or other things of value to be held, used and applied to carry out the purposes of this chapter (subject, however, to any conditions upon which grants or contributions are made) including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, bequests of money or devises from any source, including the federal government or any of its agencies or instrumentalities for the purposes of this chapter. Unless otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift or bequest, the Board is authorized to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of such money, securities, or other property given or bequeathed to it in furtherance of its purposes;

Borrow money to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to execute evidences of such indebtedness and to secure the same and to issue negotiable revenue bonds payable solely from funds pledged for that purpose and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof, provided that, any moneys borrowed, whether through the use of bonds or other indebtedness, may be secured or paid solely from funds received pursuant to subdivision 11 or funds received from the fees and charges imposed by the Authority pursuant to subdivision 14;

Use any fund or funds of the Authority for any and all expenses to be paid by the Authority including, by way of example, but not by limitation, any and all expenses for administrative, legal, and other services;

Collect fees and charges, as the Authority determines to be reasonable, in connection with its loans, insurance, guarantees, commitments and servicing thereof;

Take any action necessary or convenient for the exercise of the powers granted by this chapter or reasonably implied from them; and

Maintain the confidentiality of financial, medical, rehabilitative and other personal information submitted to or maintained by the Authority concerning applicants for or recipients of loan funds. Such information shall not be subject to the mandatory disclosure provisions of §

2.2-3704

or the public meeting requirements of §

2.2-3711

of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act.

History.

1995, c. 812; 2002, c. 19; 2004, c. 728; 2006, cc. 344, 380.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 19 added “other equipment, or other authorized purposes” at the end of subdivision 5.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 728 added present subdivision 12 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 344 and 380 are identical, and added the second sentence in subdivision 9.

§ 51.5-57.
Assistive Technology Loan Fund established.

There is hereby established a permanent and perpetual fund to be known as the Assistive Technology Loan Fund, consisting of such moneys as may be appropriated by the General Assembly from time to time, gifts, bequests, endowments or grants from the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, all receipts by the Fund from loans made by it, all income from the investment of moneys held in the Fund, and any other available sources of funds, public and private. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest and income earned from the investment of such funds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it.

The Fund shall be used to provide loans to individuals with disabilities within the Commonwealth for the purpose of acquiring assistive technology, other equipment, or other authorized purposes designed to help such individuals become more independent. The Fund shall also be used to buy down interest rates of lending institutions making such loans and provide a loan guarantee for loans made by lending institutions for such purposes. The Fund shall be used only when, in the discretion of the Board, loan applicants have met eligibility criteria and the release of money is deemed appropriate.

The Fund shall be administered and managed by the Authority. The costs and expenses of maintaining, servicing and administering the Fund may be paid out of amounts in the Fund.

History.

1995, c. 812; 2002, c. 19.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 19 substituted “technology, other equipment, or other authorized purposes” for “technology or other equipment” in the first sentence of subsection B.

§ 51.5-58.
Provision of loans.

The Board may enter into loan agreements with any qualifying borrower who demonstrates (i) that the loan will be used to acquire assistive technology, other equipment, or other authorized purposes designed to help one or more persons with disabilities to improve their independence or become more productive members of the community and (ii) who has the ability to repay the loan.

The amount and terms of any loan shall be determined by the Board.

All loans must be repaid on such terms and at such interest rates as the Board may, from time to time, determine to be appropriate in accordance with a procedure prescribed by regulations adopted pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1995, c. 812; 2002, c. 19.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 19 substituted “technology, other equipment, or other authorized purposes” for “technology or other equipment” in clause (i) of subsection A.

§ 51.5-59.
Annual report; Auditor of Public Accounts to audit books and accounts.

The Board shall submit an annual report that includes a statement of the receipts, disbursements, and current investments of the Fund for the preceding year to the Governor and the General Assembly. The report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operation of the Fund during the year, including any loan fund or loan guarantee fund the Authority administers or manages. The Auditor of Public Accounts or his legally authorized representatives shall audit the books and accounts of the Authority and any loan fund or loan guarantee fund the Authority administers or manages as determined necessary by the Auditor of Public Accounts.

History.

1995, c. 812; 2006, cc. 344, 380; 2018, cc. 57, 307.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 344 and 380 are identical, and inserted “report that includes a” in the first sentence, and added the language beginning “including any loan fund” at the end.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 57 and 307 are identical, and in the third sentence, deleted “at least once in a year” following “representatives shall” and added “as determined necessary by the Auditor of Public Accounts” at the end.